Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1 URBAN RENEWAL
The governing body or the authority may enter into an agreement with any taxing entity within the boundaries of which property taxes collected as a result of the taxing entity's levy, or any portion of the levy, will be subject to allocation pursuant to subsection (9) of this section. The agreement may provide for the allocation of responsibility among the parties to the agreement for payment of the costs of any additional county infrastructure or services necessary to offset the impacts of an urban renewal project and for the sharing of revenues. Except with the consent of the governing body or the authority, any such shared revenues shall be limited to all or any portion of the taxes levied upon taxable property within the urban renewal area by the taxing entity. The agreement may provide for a waiver of any provision of this part 1 that provides for notice to the taxing entity, requires any filing with or by the taxing entity, requires or permits consent from the taxing entity, or provides any enforcement right to the taxing entity.

Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection (12), the county may enforce the requirements of subparagraphs (III) and (IV) of paragraph (a) of subsection (3.5) and paragraph (h) of subsection (4) of this section by means of the arbitration process established by this subsection (12) where:

Property located within such county is included within an urban renewal plan;

The county has provided information requested pursuant to subsection (3.7) of this section; and

The county has appeared at a public hearing held pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section and presented evidence at such hearing that development within the urban renewal area will create a need for additional county infrastructure and services; except that the requirements of this subparagraph (III) shall not apply in the case of a county that did not receive an urban renewal plan, a substantial modification to the plan, or an urban renewal impact report, as applicable, pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (3.5) of this section.

A county objecting under the provisions of this section to an urban renewal plan approved under subsection (4) of this section that received on a timely basis an urban renewal plan, a substantial modification to the plan, or an urban renewal impact report, as applicable, pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (3.5) of this section shall file written notice of the objection with the authority as well as the governing body that has approved the plan within fifteen days of the date of the approval of the plan. A county objecting under the provisions of this section to an urban renewal plan approved under subsection (4) of this section that did not receive on a timely basis an urban renewal plan, a substantial modification to the plan, or an urban renewal impact report, as applicable, pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (3.5) of this section shall file written notice of the objection with the authority as well as the governing body that has approved the plan within thirty days of the date of the approval of the plan or within five days of the date of the county's receipt of the plan, whichever date is later. The notice of objection shall include a statement of the grounds upon which the county asserts that the authority or the governing body has failed to comply with the requirements of subparagraphs (III) and (IV) of paragraph (a) of subsection (3.5) and paragraph (h) of subsection (4) of this section. The notice of objection shall also include the name of one attorney who has been licensed for a minimum of ten years in the state of Colorado, who is experienced in administrative and land use law, and who the board of county commissioners of the county believes to be qualified to serve as a member of the panel of arbitrators charged with resolving the county's objections in accordance with the requirements of this subsection (12).

Within twenty days of receipt of the notice of objection, the governing body shall submit to the county the name of one additional person to serve as a member of the panel of arbitrators, which person shall also satisfy the requirements specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b). Within twenty days of such submission, the two members of the arbitration panel selected by the county and the governing body shall jointly select an additional person to serve as the third and final member of the panel of arbitrators, which person shall also satisfy the requirements specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b). The panel of three arbitrators selected pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall be charged with resolving the county's objections in accordance with the requirements of this subsection (12). Notwithstanding the provisions of this paragraph (b), the county, governing body, and authority may agree upon a single arbitrator to resolve the county's objections.

If the county, governing body, and authority have not reached a written agreement resolving the county's objections within thirty days after the receipt by the governing body of the notice specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), the objections specified in the notice shall be submitted to arbitration in accordance with the requirements of this subsection (12).

The arbitration hearing, if any, shall commence within sixty days after the receipt by the governing body of the notice of objection. The parties to the arbitration shall be the county, governing body, and authority. At the arbitration hearing, the governing body or the authority, as applicable, shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that it submitted the urban renewal plan, a substantial modification to the plan, and an urban renewal impact report, as applicable, to the county pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (3.5) of this section and that it did not abuse its discretion in preparing the estimate or statement provided to the county pursuant to subparagraphs (III) and (IV) of paragraph (a) of subsection (3.5) of this section and that the governing body did not abuse its discretion in connection with the findings it has made under paragraph (h) of subsection (4) of this section. The decision of the arbitrators shall be based upon the objections contained in the notice filed pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (12) and upon the record of the hearing held pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. In rendering a decision, the arbitrators shall take into consideration the goals and objectives of the urban renewal plan, information that has been submitted by the county as contained in the record of the hearing on the urban renewal plan and the impact report provided to the county pursuant to subsection (3.5) of this section, the reasonableness of the county's objections contained in the notice, the extent to which the urban renewal project will improve existing county infrastructure, the extent to which tax increment revenues, if any, to be generated by development within the urban renewal area and collected by the authority pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of this section may reasonably be expected to defray the cost of the additional infrastructure and services requested by the county, and the debt service requirements of the authority. The arbitration hearing shall be concluded not later than seven days after its commencement, and the decision of the arbitrators shall be rendered not later than thirty days after the conclusion of the hearing. The order of the arbitrators shall be limited to either approving the urban renewal plan or, upon a finding of abuse of discretion, remanding the plan to the governing body for reconsideration of the county's objections. The order shall be final and binding on the parties and shall not be subject to judicial review except to enforce the order or to determine whether the order was procured by corruption, fraud, or other similar wrongdoing.

Fifty percent of the necessary fees and necessary expenses of any arbitration conducted pursuant to this subsection (12), excluding all fees and expenses incurred by either party in the preparation or presentation of its case, shall be borne by the county, and fifty percent of such fees and expenses shall be borne by the governing body or the authority.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the provisions of this subsection (12) shall not apply to any urban renewal plan in which less than ten percent of the area identified in such plan:

Has been classified as agricultural land for purposes of the levying and collection of property tax pursuant to section 39-1-103, C.R.S., at any time during the three-year period prior to the date of adoption of the plan; and

Is currently identified for agricultural uses in a master plan adopted by the municipality pursuant to section 31-23-206 and has been so identified for more than one year prior to the date of adoption of the plan.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the arbitration process established in this subsection (12) shall be the exclusive remedy available to a county for contesting the sufficiency of compliance by a governing body or an authority with the requirements of this section.

Not later than thirty days after the municipality has provided the county assessor the notice required by paragraph (a) of subsection (10) of this section, the county assessor may provide written notice to the municipality if the assessor believes that agricultural land has been improperly included in the urban renewal area in violation of subparagraph (II) or (III) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section. If the notice is not delivered within the thirty-day period, the inclusion of the land in the urban renewal area as described in the urban renewal plan shall be incontestable in any suit or proceeding notwithstanding the presence of any cause. If the assessor provides notice to the municipality within the thirty-day period, the municipality may file an action in state district court exercising jurisdiction over the county in which the land is located for an order determining whether the inclusion of the land in the urban renewal area is consistent with one of the conditions specified in subparagraph (II) or (III) of paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of this section and shall have an additional thirty days from the date it receives the notice in which to file such action. If the municipality fails to file such an action within the additional thirty-day period, the agricultural land shall not become part of the urban renewal area.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1167, § 1, effective July 1; (9) added, p. 1276, § 1, effective July 16.

L. 81:

(9)(a), (9)(c), and (9)(e) amended, p. 1516, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(9)(f) added, p. 435, § 1, effective April 19; (3.5) added, p. 1255, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1), (3), and (4) amended and (10) added, p. 530, § 3, effective May 3.

L. 2004:

(3) amended and (4.5) added, p. 1746, § 5, effective June 4.

L. 2005:

(3.5) and (9)(a)(II) amended and (3.7), (4)(h), (11), and (12) added, pp. 1259, 1263, §§ 1, 2, effective June 3.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 1004, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1912, § 121, effective August 5; (9)(a)(III) added and (9)(b) amended, p. 1245, §§ 1, 2, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(1)(c), IP(3.5)(a), (9)(a)(II), (10)(a), and (11) amended and (1)(d), (3.5)(c), (9)(g), (9)(h), and (13) added, (HB 10-1107), ch. 89, pp. 299, 302, 303, §§ 3, 4, 5, 6, effective June 1; (11) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2127, § 193, effective August 11.

L. 2013:

(9)(a)(I) amended, (HB 13-1295), ch. 314, p. 1656, § 12, effective July 1, 2014.

L. 2015:

IP(9)(a) and (9)(a)(II) amended and (9)(i) and (9.5) added, (HB 15-1348), ch. 261, p. 986, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(9.5) amended and (9.7) added, (SB 16-177), ch. 178, p. 611, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2017:

(7) and (9.7) amended and (7.5) added, (SB 17-279), ch. 249, p. 1046, § 1, effective May 25; (9.6) added, (HB 17-1016), ch. 20, p. 65, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(9)(a)(II) and (9.7)(b) amended, (SB 18-248), ch. 339, p. 2027, § 1, effective May 30.

L. 2019:

(9)(a)(I) amended, (HB-1240), ch. 264, p. 2503, § 11, effective June 1; (1)(b) amended, (HB 19-1084), ch. 47, p. 158, § 1, effective September 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-107 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act amending subsection (9)(a)(I), see section 1 of chapter 314, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.